Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,162
Merger.

(MBCA 11.02) (a) One or more domestic business
corporations may merge with one or more domestic or foreign business corporations
or eligible entities pursuant to a plan of merger or two or more foreign business
corporations or domestic or foreign eligible entities may merge into a new
domestic business corporation to be created in the merger in the manner provided
in sections 21-2,161 to 21-2,168.

(b) A foreign business corporation,
or a foreign eligible entity, may be a party to a merger with a domestic business
corporation or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger only if the
merger is permitted by the organic law of the foreign business corporation
or eligible entity.

(c)
If the organic law of a domestic eligible entity does not provide procedures
for the approval of a merger, a plan of merger may be adopted and approved,
the merger effectuated, and appraisal rights exercised in accordance with
the procedures in sections 21-2,161 to 21-2,168 and 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.
For the purposes of applying sections 21-2,161 to 21-2,168 and 21-2,171 to
21-2,183:

(1)
The eligible entity, its members or interest holders, eligible interests,
and organic documents taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic business
corporation, shareholders, shares, and articles of incorporation, respectively
and vice versa as the context may require; and

(2) If the business and affairs of the
eligible entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to
the members or interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board
of directors.

(d)
The plan of merger must include:

(1) The name of each domestic or foreign business
corporation or eligible entity that will merge and the name of the domestic
or foreign business corporation or eligible entity that will be the survivor
of the merger;

(2)
The terms and conditions of the merger;

(3) The manner and basis of converting the shares
of each merging domestic or foreign business corporation and eligible interests
of each merging domestic or foreign eligible entity into shares or other securities,
eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities,
or eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

(4) The articles of incorporation
of any domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation or the organic
documents of any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity to be created by
the merger or, if a new domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation
or unincorporated entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments
to the survivor's articles of incorporation or organic documents; and

(5) Any other provisions
required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized or by
which it is governed or by the articles of incorporation or organic document
of any such party.

(e)
Terms of a plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable
outside the plan in accordance with subsection (k) of section 21-203.

(f) The plan of merger may
also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles
of merger, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party
to the merger are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan must
provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by such shareholders the plan
may not be amended to change:

(1)
The amount or kind of shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations,
rights to acquire shares, other securities, or eligible interests, cash, or
other property to be received under the plan by the shareholders of or owners
of eligible interests in any party to the merger;

(2) The articles of incorporation of
any corporation or the organic documents of any unincorporated entity that
will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted
by section 21-2,154 or by comparable provisions of the organic laws of any
such foreign corporation or domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; or

(3) Any of the other terms
or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders
in any material respect.

(g)
Property held in trust or for charitable purposes under the laws of this state
by a domestic or foreign eligible entity shall not be diverted by a merger
from the objects for which it was donated, granted, or devised unless and
until the eligible entity obtains an order of the court specifying the disposition
of the property to the extent required by and pursuant to cy pres or other
nondiversion law of this state.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 162.